Illinois, session 104th, SB115.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Athletic Organization Act 5is amended by adding Section 1.30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 25/1.30 new)7    Sec. 1.30. Equal participation in events. An association 8or other entity that promotes, sponsors, regulates, or in any 9manner provides for interscholastic athletics or any form of 10athletic competition among schools and students within this 11State may not adopt or maintain in effect any bylaw, rule, 12regulation, or policy which does not allow equal access for 13participation in interscholastic athletics or athletic 14competitions by a student based upon whether the student 15attends a public school, nonpublic school, or home school if 16the association or other entity receives any membership or 17other dues or fees from the governing body of any public 18elementary or public secondary school in this State. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.